Utah statutes.
17-42-103.   Animal shelters shall transfer only sterilized animals, or
shall require sterilization deposit.
(1)  An animal shelter may not transfer an animal that has not been
sterilized, except as provided in Subsection (2) or Section 17-42-105.5.
(2)  An animal shelter may transfer an animal for adoption that has not been
sterilized only if the animal shelter:
(a)  establishes a written agreement, executed by the recipient, stating the
animal is not sterilized and the recipient agrees in writing to be responsible
for ensuring the animal is sterilized:
(i)  within 30 days after the agreement is signed, if the animal is six months
of age or older; or
(ii)  if the animal is younger than six months of age, within 30 days after
the animal becomes six months of age; and
(b)  receives from the recipient a sterilization deposit as provided under
Section 17-42-104, the terms of which are part of the written agreement
executed by the recipient under this section.
